California statutes. Education Code
(a) When a school district or a county superintendent of schools wishes to employ a person in a position requiring certification qualifications and that person has not previously been employed in a position requiring certification qualifications in this state, the district or county superintendent shall require a medical certificate in such form as shall be prescribed by the state board showing that the applicant is free from any disabling disease unfitting the applicant to instruct or associate with children. The medical certificate shall be submitted directly to the governing board or county superintendent by a physician and surgeon licensed under the Business and Professions Code, a physician assistant practicing in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division
 2 of the Business and Professions Code, a licensed advanced practice registered nurse acting pursuant to standardized procedures and protocols in compliance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a commissioned medical officer exempted from licensure pursuant to federal law. The medical examination shall have been conducted not more than six months before the submission of the certificate and shall be at the expense of the applicant. A governing board or county superintendent may offer a contract of employment to an applicant subject to the submission of the required medical certificate. Notwithstanding Section 44031, the medical certificate shall become a part of the personnel record of the employee and shall
 be open to the employee or his or her designee.

(b) The governing board of a school district or a county superintendent of schools may require certificated employees to undergo a periodic medical examination by a physician and surgeon licensed under the Business and Professions Code, a physician assistant practicing in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, a licensed advanced practice registered nurse acting pursuant to standardized procedures and protocols in compliance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a commissioned medical officer exempted from licensure pursuant to
 federal law, to determine that the employee is free from any communicable disease unfitting the applicant to instruct or associate with children. The periodic medical examination shall be at the expense of the school district or county superintendent. The medical certificate shall become a part of the personnel record of the employee and shall be open to the employee or his or her designee.

(c) The state board shall adopt rules and regulations relating to the implementation and administration of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 34, Sec. 1.   (SB 171)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44839.5.

(a) When a school district or county superintendent of schools wishes to employ a retirant who is retired for service, and such person has not been previously employed as a retirant, such district or county superintendent shall require, as a condition of initial employment as a retirant, a medical certificate in such form as shall be prescribed by the state board showing that the retirant is free from any disabling disease unfitting him or her to instruct or associate with children. The medical certificate shall be completed and submitted directly to the school district or county superintendent by a physician and surgeon licensed under the Business and Professions Code, a physician assistant practicing in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the
 Business and Professions Code, a licensed advanced practice registered nurse acting pursuant to standardized procedures and protocols in compliance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a commissioned medical officer exempted from licensure pursuant to federal law. A medical examination as prescribed by the State Board of Education shall be required for the completion of the medical certificate. Such examination shall be conducted not more than six months before the completion and submission of the certificate and shall be at the expense of the retirant. Notwithstanding Section 44031, the medical certificate shall become a part of the personnel record of the employee and shall be open to the employee or his
 or her designee.

(b) The school district or county superintendent of schools which initially employed the retirant, or any school district or county superintendent which subsequently employs the retirant, may require a periodic medical examination by a physician and surgeon licensed under the Business and Professions Code, a physician assistant practicing in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, a licensed advanced practice registered nurse acting pursuant to standardized procedures and protocols in compliance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a commissioned medical
 officer exempted from licensure pursuant to federal law, to determine that the retirant is free from any communicable disease unfitting him or her to instruct or associate with children. The periodic medical examination shall be at the expense of the school district or county superintendent. The medical certificate shall become a part of the personnel record of the retirant and shall be open to the retirant or his or her designee.

(c) The state board shall adopt rules and regulations relating to the implementation and administration of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 34, Sec. 2.   (SB 171)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44840.

Persons in positions requiring certification qualifications may be elected for the next ensuing school year on and after the 15th day of March, and each person so elected shall be deemed reelected from year to year except as provided in Section 35043, Sections 44221 to 44227, inclusive, Sections 44831 to 44891, inclusive, Sections 44893 to 44900, inclusive, Sections 44901 to 44906, inclusive, and Sections 44908 to 44919, inclusive.

At any time after the 31st day of December, any person not then employed in the school district may be elected for the next ensuing school year to a position requiring certification qualifications.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44841.

Commencing July 1, 2025, a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school shall not hire any person for purposes of a short-term staff permit, provisional internship permit, or a teaching permit for statutory leave, as described in Sections 80021, 80021.1, and 80022, respectively, of Article 2 of Chapter 1 of Division 8 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, unless that person has a certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) that meets the standards established by the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 65, Sec. 3.   (AB 2345)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44842.

(a) Except as set forth in subdivision (b), if, without good cause, a probationary or permanent employee of a school district fails prior to July 1 of any school year to notify the governing board of the district of his or her intention to remain or not to remain in the service of the district, as the case may be, during the ensuing school year if a request to give such notice, including a copy of this section, shall have been personally served upon the employee, or mailed to him or her by United States certified mail with return receipt requested to his or her last known place of address, by the clerk or secretary of the governing board of the school district, not later than the preceding May 30, the employee may be deemed to have declined employment and his or her services as an employee of the district may be terminated on June 30 of that year.

(b) (1) In the case of an employee of a year-round school serving in a track that starts within 14 days of July 1, and serves in a position requiring certification qualifications, if the school district has, by April 30, requested that the employee notify the school district by June 1, of that year of his or her intention to remain or not to remain in the service of the school district for the following school year, and the employee, without good cause, fails to provide that notice, the school district may deem the employee to have declined employment and may terminate his or her services as an employee of the school district on June 30 of that year. An employee who gives notice of resignation pursuant to this paragraph after May 31, but before June 30, shall be released from his or her contract within 30 days of the employee’s notice, or as soon as a replacement employee is obtained, whichever occurs first.

(2) The request for notice sent to the employee by the school district pursuant to this subdivision shall be in writing and shall, along with a copy of this section, be either personally served upon the employee, or mailed to him or her by United States certified mail with return receipt requested to his or her last known address, by the clerk or secretary of the governing board of the school district.

(c) If, without good cause, a probationary or permanent employee of a school district fails to report for duty at the beginning of the ensuing school year after having notified the governing board of the district of his or her intention to remain in the service of the district in accordance with the procedures specified above, the employee may be deemed to have declined employment and his or her services as an employee of the district may be terminated on the day following the 20th consecutive day of absence. No school district may terminate any employee pursuant to this subdivision unless the district has specifically notified the employee, at least five days in advance, of the time and place at which the employee was to report to work, and the employee did not request or was not granted a leave of absence authorized by the governing board of the district.

This subdivision is applicable only to employees who were on leave of absence for 20 or more consecutive working days after April 30 of the previous school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 533, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

44843.

The county superintendent of schools shall be given immediate notice in writing by the governing board of the school district of the employment of persons for positions requiring certification qualifications. The notice shall include, but not be limited to, such data as may be prescribed by the Superintendent, in regulations that the Superintendent may by this provision adopt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 35.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44844.

Except as otherwise provided in Sections 44831 to 44855, inclusive, every probationary or permanent employee employed before July 1, 1947, shall be deemed to have been employed on the date upon which he first accepted employment in a probationary position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 433.)
-------------------------------------------

44845.

Every probationary or permanent employee employed after June 30, 1947, shall be deemed to have been employed on the date upon which he first rendered paid service in a probationary position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 433.)
-------------------------------------------

44846.

The following general provisions shall apply regardless of date of employment:

As between two or more employees who first rendered paid service to the district on the same date, and who, following the termination of services, have a statutory preference to reappointment in the order of original employment, the governing board shall determine the order of reemployment solely on the basis of the needs of the district and the students thereof. Any terminated employee subject to the conditions of this section shall, upon request, be furnished in writing, no later than 15 days following such request, the reasons and basis of the needs of the district and the students thereof utilized by the governing board in determining which employee or employees shall be reappointed. This requirement that the governing board provide, on request, a written statement of reasons for determining the order of reappointment shall not be interpreted to give affected employees any legal right or interest that would not exist without such a requirement.

Records showing date of employment, whether kept by the district or by the county, shall be accessible, on demand, to any certificated employee of the district or to his designated representative.

In the absence of records as to any of the matters referred to in the two preceding sections, the governing board, in accordance with evidence presented, shall determine the order of employment after giving employees a reasonable opportunity to present such evidence. 

The order of employment in all districts, when required, shall be determined as prescribed by Sections 44830 to 44855, inclusive.

The governing board shall have power and it shall be its duty to correct any errors discovered from time to time in its records showing the order of employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 898.)
-------------------------------------------

44847.

When any school or part thereof shall have been transferred from one district to another, employment for any employees who transfer with said school or part thereof shall date from the time said employees first accepted employment (if before July 1, 1947) or rendered paid service (if after June 30, 1947) as probationary employees in the district from which the school or part thereof and the said employees were transferred.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44848.

When any certificated employee shall have resigned or been dismissed for cause and shall thereafter have been reemployed by the board, his date of employment shall be deemed to be the date on which he first accepted reemployment (if reemployed before July 1, 1947) or rendered paid service (if reemployed after June 30, 1947) after his reemployment.

When an employee’s services are terminated for lack of enrollment or discontinuance of service or are otherwise interrupted in a manner declared by law not to constitute a break in service, his original order of employment shall stand.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44849.

Nothing in Sections 35029, 35161, 35162, Sections 44030 to 44034, inclusive, Sections 44036 to 44048, inclusive, Sections 44800 to 44802, inclusive, Sections 44804 to 44824, inclusive, Sections 45021 to 45060, inclusive, Sections 48913, 87462, 87463, 87469, 88021, 88071, Article 1 (commencing with Section 7000) of Chapter 1, Article 1 (commencing with Section 7100) of Chapter 2 of Part 5, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 10300) of Part 7, Article 1 (commencing with Section 12500) of Chapter 5 of Part 8, Article 5 (commencing with Section 32340) of Chapter 3 of Part 19, Article 1 (commencing with Section 44000), Article 3 (commencing with Section 44060) of Chapter 1, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 44200), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 44400), Article 2 (commencing with Section 44830), Article 3 (commencing with Section 44930) of Chapter 4, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 45100), Article 2 (commencing with Section 87600), Article 4 (commencing with Section 87660) of Chapter 3 of Part 51, shall be construed in a manner as to deprive any person of his or her rights and remedies in a court of competent jurisdiction on a question of law and fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

44850.

Nothing in Sections 35029, 35161, 35162, Sections 44030 to 44034, inclusive, Sections 44036 to 44048, inclusive, Sections 44800 to 44802, inclusive, Sections 44804 to 44824, inclusive, Sections 45021 to 45060, inclusive, Sections 48913, 87462, 87463, 87469, 88021, 88071, Article 1 (commencing with Section 7000) of Chapter 1, Article 1 (commencing with Section 7100) of Chapter 2 of Part 5, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 10300) of Part 7, Article 1 (commencing with Section 12500) of Chapter 5 of Part 8, Article 5 (commencing with Section 32340) of Chapter 3 of Part 19, Article 1 (commencing with Section 44000), Article 3 (commencing with Section 44060) of Chapter 1, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 44200), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 44400), Article 2 (commencing with Section 44830), Article 3 (commencing with Section 44930) of Chapter 4, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 45100), Article 2 (commencing with Section 87600), Article 4 (commencing with Section 87660) of Chapter 3 of Part 51, shall be construed so as to repeal or negate any provisions concerning employees of school districts contained in the charter of any city, county, or city and county, adopted and approved in conformity with Article XI of the Constitution of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 197.)
-------------------------------------------

44850.1.

Notwithstanding Section 44850, and notwithstanding provisions of the charter of any city or city and county to the contrary, on and after July 1, 1978, the certificated employees of any school district governed by such a charter who serve as the head of a department of the district or in an administrative or supervisory position shall neither acquire nor retain permanent status in such position unless the employee is or becomes eligible for permanent status in accordance with provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 315.)
-------------------------------------------

44851.

All employments under the provisions of Section 35161, Sections 44221 to 44227, inclusive, Sections 44831 to 44887, inclusive, Sections 44889 to 44891, inclusive, Sections 44893 to 44906, inclusive, Sections 44908 to 44919, inclusive, Sections 87462 and 87469, shall be subordinate to the right of the Legislature to amend or repeal Section 35161, Sections 44221 to 44227, inclusive, Sections 44831 to 44887, inclusive, Sections 44889 to 44891, inclusive, Sections 44893 to 44906, inclusive, Sections 44908 to 44919, inclusive, Sections 87462 and 87469, or any provision or provisions thereof at any time, and nothing herein contained shall be construed to confer upon any person employed pursuant to the provisions hereof a contract which will be impaired by the amendment or repeal of Section 35161, Sections 44221 to 44227, inclusive, Sections 44831 to 44887, inclusive, Sections 44889 to 44891, inclusive, Sections 44893 to 44906, inclusive, Sections 44908 to 44919, inclusive, Sections 87462 and 87469, or of any provision or provisions thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44852.

Nothing in this code shall be construed as prohibiting the employment of persons in positions requiring certification qualifications for less than a full school year in temporary schools or classes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44853.

The governing board of any school district, subject to the rules and regulations prescribed by the state board, may enter into an agreement with the proper authorities of any foreign country, or of any state, territory, or possession of the United States, or other district within the state, for the exchange and employment of regularly credentialed employees and employees of public schools of any foreign country, state, territory, or possession, or other district within this state. Any certificated person employed as provided in this section shall be known as an “exchange certificated employee.” No exchange shall be made without the consent of the employee to be exchanged.

Due consideration shall be given to the general qualifications and professional status of the
 exchange employee as compared to the general qualifications and professional status of the employee for whom exchanged. However, it shall not be a requirement that an exchange certificated employee be a teacher of the same subject or grade, or both, as the employee for whom exchanged. If the service authorized is other than teaching, it shall not be a requirement that the service be at the same grade level or that the service be exactly the same as the employee for whom exchanged.

A person shall not be employed as an exchange employee by a school district in the state unless he or she holds the necessary valid credential or credentials issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing authorizing the person to serve in a position requiring certification qualifications in the school district proposing to employ the person. The commission may establish minimum standards for the credentials for exchange certificated employees, provided that no exchange certificated
 employee shall be required to pay a fee or other charge for the issuance of any necessary valid credential or credentials authorizing him or her to serve in a position requiring certification qualifications in any school district in this state.

An exchange agreement may be made for a period not to exceed three years.

At the end of the assignment period, the exchange, with the consent of all parties, may be made complete and permanent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 53, Sec. 11.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44854.

Acceptance of any exchange position by an employee of any school district in the state shall not affect his or her right to the permanent classification to which he or she is entitled, at the time of the acceptance, or any of his or her rights under the state teachers retirement salary provisions of this code, or under any local or district retirement plan, or system, and the time served in the exchange position shall be counted as time served in the service of the district in which he or she is employed immediately prior to acceptance of the exchange position in determining his or her status under Sections 35029, 35161, 35162, Sections 44030 to 44034, inclusive, Sections 44036 to 44048, inclusive, Sections 44800 to 44802, inclusive, Sections 44804 to 44824, inclusive, Sections 45021 to 45060, inclusive, Sections 48913, 87462, 87463, 87469, 88021, 88071, Article 1 (commencing with Section 7000) of Chapter 1, Article 1 (commencing with Section 7100) of Chapter 2 of Part 5, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 10300) of Part 7, Article 1 (commencing with Section 12500) of Chapter 5 of Part 8, Article 5 (commencing with Section 32340) of Chapter 3 of Part 19, Article 1 (commencing with Section 44000), Article 3 (commencing with Section 44060) of Chapter 1, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 44200), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 44400), Article 2 (commencing with Section 44830), Article 3 (commencing with Section 44930) of Chapter 4, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 45100), Article 2 (commencing with Section 87600), Article 4 (commencing with Section 87660) of Chapter 3 of Part 51, and under the provisions of this code relating to state retirement salary, and under any local or district retirement plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 198.)
-------------------------------------------

44855.

If the teacher from the district within the state who serves as an exchange teacher without the state and the governing board regularly employing him so agree, the district may pay his regular salary, making all deductions provided by law for retirement purposes, during the period of the exchange teaching. In such case the district shall not pay the salary of the exchange teacher from without the state, serving the district in exchange for its regular teacher.

In the event a teacher from a district within this state serving as an exchange teacher without the state and to whom the governing board of such district is paying the regular salary of such teacher as herein provided, is compelled to absent herself from her duties because of injury, illness or quarantine, the governing board of the district within this state may pay the substitute employed to take the place of such teacher and shall deduct the amount so paid the substitute from the compensation of the teacher.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44856.

(a) The governing board of a school district, for the purposes of providing bilingual instruction, world language instruction, or cultural enrichment, in the schools of the school district, subject to the rules and regulations of the state board, may conclude arrangements with the proper authorities of a foreign country, or of a state, territory, or possession of the United States, for the hiring of bilingual teachers employed in public or private schools of a foreign country, state, territory, or possession. To be eligible for employment, the teacher must speak English fluently. Any persons employed pursuant to this section shall be known as a “sojourn certificated employee.”

(b) A person shall not be hired as a sojourn certificated employee by a school district
 unless he or she holds the necessary valid credential or credentials issued by the commission authorizing the person to serve in a position requiring certification qualifications in the school district proposing to employ him or her. The person may be employed for a period not to exceed two years, except that thereafter the period of employment may be extended from year to year for a total period of not more than five years upon verification by the employing school district that termination of the employment would adversely affect an existing bilingual or world language program or program of cultural enrichment, and that attempts to secure the employment of a certificated California teacher qualified to fill the position have been unsuccessful. The commission shall establish minimum standards for the credentials for sojourn certificated employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 13.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44857.

Each person employed by the governing board of a school district for a position requiring certification qualifications shall, not later than 60 days after the date fixed by the governing board of the district for the commencement of the person’s service, register, in the manner prescribed by Section 44330, a valid certification document issued on or before that date, authorizing the person to serve in the position for which he or she was employed, and shall, not later than 60 days after the renewal thereof, register the renewed certification document in the manner prescribed by Section 44330. If any person so employed is the holder of a California State University, or state teachers college, diploma accompanied by the certificate of the State Board of Education, or of an educational or life diploma of this state, and has presented the diploma to, and has had his or her name recorded by, the county superintendent of schools of the county, the person shall be deemed to have registered the diploma under Section 44330.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

44858.

The Legislature hereby declares that it is contrary to the interest of this state and of the people of the state for any governing board or any person charged by the governing board of any school district with the responsibility of interviewing and recommending persons for employment in positions requiring certification, to fail or refuse to interview or recommend a person applying for employment in a position requiring certification on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in this code and in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 788, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

44859.

No school district may adopt or maintain any rule or regulation which requires a candidate for a position requiring certification qualifications to be a resident of the district or to become a resident of the district, or which requires that an employee maintain residency within the district; nor may a district grant any preferential treatment to candidates or employees because they are residents of the district.

The Legislature in enacting this section recognizes that the public school system of this state is the property of all its citizens, and that all qualified candidates for positions of employment with school districts, regardless of residence, should be granted the opportunity to compete for and obtain such positions based solely on merit and fitness.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44860.

No person shall be employed as principal of a school of six or more certificated employees unless he or she holds a valid school administration credential and at least one of the following: a teaching credential, or a services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel, health, clinical or rehabilitative, or librarian services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

44861.

A substitute principal holding a valid teacher’s credential of the same grade as the school to be administered may be employed without meeting the requirements of Section 44860 to meet an emergency for not more than five months of any school year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44862.

No person is eligible to teach in any public school in the state, or to receive a certificate to teach who has not attained the age of 18 years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44863.

No teacher holding a special certificate shall be employed to teach any subject not authorized in the certificate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44864.

Each teacher in a joint elementary district shall hold a valid certificate in the county in which the schoolhouse is located.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44865.

A valid teaching credential issued by the State Board or the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, based on a bachelor’s degree, student teaching, and special fitness to perform, shall be deemed qualifying for assignment as a teacher in the following assignments, provided that the assignment of a teacher to a position for which qualifications are prescribed by this section shall be made only with the consent of the teacher:

(a) Home teacher.

(b) Classes organized primarily for adults.

(c) Hospital classes.

(d) Necessary small high schools.

(e) Continuation schools.

(f) Alternative schools.

(g) Opportunity schools.

(h) Juvenile court schools.

(i) County community schools.

(j) District community day schools.

(k) Independent study.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 223, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

44866.

The qualifications of a home instructor of pupils with physical disabilities shall be a valid teaching credential or a credential authorizing the teaching of exceptional children in an area of specialized preparation issued by the state board, or the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

44867.

Except as provided in Section 44865, teachers in opportunity schools, classes, or programs shall have the same qualifications and shall be employed in the same manner as in other elementary and secondary schools of the school district in which the opportunity schools, classes, or programs are situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 260, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

44868.

No person shall be employed as a teacher librarian in an elementary or secondary school, unless he or she holds a valid credential of proper grade authorizing service as a teacher librarian or a valid teaching credential issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing if he or she has completed the specialized area of librarianship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 730, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

44869.

A teacher librarian, when employed full time as a teacher librarian or serving full time, partly as a teacher librarian and partly as a teacher, shall rank as a teacher.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 730, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

44870.

No one shall be employed to supervise the work of teachers for more than half time during any school week unless he is the holder of a valid teacher’s certificate authorizing him to teach in the schools and classes in which he is to supervise instruction and a valid supervision certificate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44871.

The qualifications of supervisors of health shall be as provided in Sections 44873 to 44878, inclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44872.

For the purposes of Sections 44873 to 44878, inclusive, “standard designated services credential with a specialization in health” and “services credential with a specialization in health” includes a community college health services credential when the service is provided in grades 13 and 14.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44873.

The qualifications for a physician and surgeon employed to serve on a half-time or greater than half-time basis shall be a valid certificate to practice medicine and surgery issued by the Medical Board of California or Osteopathic Medical Board of California and either a services credential with a specialization in health or a valid credential issued prior to November 23, 1970. The qualifications for a physician and surgeon employed for less than half time shall be a valid certificate to practice medicine and surgery issued by the Medical Board of California. Any school district may employ and compensate physicians and surgeons meeting the foregoing qualifications for the performance of medical services for that district and shall provide liability insurance coverage for the period of his or her employment.

As used in this section “medical services” includes, but is not limited to, any medical services required to be performed while required to be in attendance at high school athletic contests or meets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 359, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

44874.

The qualifications for a psychologist or social worker are a valid certificate issued by the appropriate California agency authorized by law to certify such persons and a services credential with a specialization in health. Any school district may employ and compensate psychologists and social workers meeting the foregoing qualifications.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44875.

The qualifications for a dentist are a valid certificate issued by the Board of Dental Examiners and a services credential with a specialization in health or a valid credential issued prior to November 23, 1970. Any school district may employ and compensate dentists meeting the foregoing qualifications.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44876.

The qualifications for a dental hygienist, dental hygienist in alternative practice, or dental hygienist in extended functions shall be a valid license issued by the Dental Hygiene Board of California or by the Dental Board of California and either a health and development credential, a standard designated services credential with a specialization in health, or a services credential with a specialization in health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 858, Sec. 62.   (SB 1482)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44877.

The qualifications for a nurse shall be a valid certificate of registration issued by the Board of Nurse Examiners of the State of California or the California Board of Nursing Education and Nurse Registration and a health and development credential, a standard designated services credential with a specialization in health, or a services credential with a specialization in health.

The services credential with a specialization in health authorizing service as a school nurse shall not authorize teaching services unless the holder also completes the requirements for a special class authorization in health in a program that is approved by the commission.

On and after January 1, 1981, the qualifications for a nurse shall also include proof satisfactory to the school district that the nurse has acquired training in child abuse and neglect detection. This requirement may be satisfied through participation by the nurse in continuing education activities relating to child abuse and neglect detection and treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 172, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44878.

The qualifications for an optometrist are a valid certificate issued by the State Board of Optometry and a services credential with a specialization in health or a credential issued prior to November 23, 1970. Any school district may employ and compensate optometrists meeting the foregoing qualifications.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44879.

The qualifications for an audiometrist working under the direction of health services personnel pursuant to Section 49420 shall be a valid certificate or license issued by, or valid registration with, the California state agency authorized by law to issue the certificate or license, or to effect the registration, required for performance of the service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44885.5.

(a) Any school district shall classify as a probationary employee of the district any person who is employed as a district intern pursuant to Section 44830.3 and any person who has completed service in the district as a district intern pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44325 and Section 44830.3 and is reelected for the next succeeding school year to a position requiring certification qualifications.

The governing board may dismiss or suspend employees classified as probationary employees pursuant to this subdivision in accordance with the procedures specified in Section 44948 or 44948.3 as applicable.
